tests/numeral-misc.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen:  ../tur.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  ../tur.automorf.hfst

Tests: 

#  "[lexc] Nominative": 
#    1<num><subst><nom> : 1
#    1<num> : 1

  "[lexc] Accusative":
    1<num><subst><acc> : 1'i
    1<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : 1'i
    2<num><subst><acc> : 2'yi
    3<num><subst><acc> : 3'ü
    3<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : 3'ü
    4<num><subst><acc> : 4'ü
    4<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : 4'ü
    5<num><subst><acc> : 5'i
    5<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : 5'i
    6<num><subst><acc> : 6'yı
    7<num><subst><acc> : 7'yi
    8<num><subst><acc> : 8'i
    8<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : 8'i
    9<num><subst><acc> : 9'u
    9<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : 9'u

  "[lexc] Genitive": 
    1<num><subst><gen> : 1'in
    2<num><subst><gen> : 2'nin
    2<num><subst><px2sg><gen> : 2'nin
    3<num><subst><gen> : 3'ün
    4<num><subst><gen> : 4'ün
    5<num><subst><gen> : 5'in
    6<num><subst><gen> : 6'nın
    6<num><subst><px2sg><gen> : 6'nın
    7<num><subst><gen> : 7'nin
    7<num><subst><px2sg><gen> : 7'nin
    8<num><subst><gen> : 8'in
    9<num><subst><gen> : 9'un


  "[lexc] Dative": 
    1<num><subst><dat> : 1'e
    2<num><subst><dat> : 2'ye
    3<num><subst><dat> : 3'e
    4<num><subst><dat> : 4'e
    5<num><subst><dat> : 5'e
    6<num><subst><dat> : 6'ya
    7<num><subst><dat> : 7'ye
    8<num><subst><dat> : 8'e
    9<num><subst><dat> : 9'a

  "[lexc] Locative": 
    1<num><subst><loc> : 1'de
    2<num><subst><loc> : 2'de
    3<num><subst><loc> : 3'te
    4<num><subst><loc> : 4'te
    5<num><subst><loc> : 5'te
    6<num><subst><loc> : 6'da
    7<num><subst><loc> : 7'de
    8<num><subst><loc> : 8'de
    9<num><subst><loc> : 9'da

  "[lexc] Ablative": 
    1<num><subst><abl> : 1'den
    2<num><subst><abl> : 2'den
    3<num><subst><abl> : 3'ten
    4<num><subst><abl> : 4'ten
    5<num><subst><abl> : 5'ten
    6<num><subst><abl> : 6'dan
    7<num><subst><abl> : 7'den
    8<num><subst><abl> : 8'den
    9<num><subst><abl> : 9'dan

  "[lexc] Ordinal": 
    1<num><ord> : 1'inci
    2<num><ord> : 2'nci
    3<num><ord> : 3'üncü
    4<num><ord> : 4'üncü
    5<num><ord> : 5'inci
    6<num><ord> : 6'ncı
    7<num><ord> : 7'nci
    8<num><ord> : 8'inci
    9<num><ord> : 9'uncu
